Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 172.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A county law library shall be established in each county seat and the fiscal court of
each county shall designate sufficient room in the courthouse, in a building of good
construction adjacent to the courthouse, in the local public library, or in a building
where sessions of the District or Circuit Court are regularly held, or a combination
of the foregoing, where such library shall be located and where the books and
materials of the library may be safely kept.
(2) The books of the county law library shall consist of all volumes belonging to the
state heretofore sent to the various county officials directed by law to receive such
books, and all volumes hereafter sent to such library by the state, and all books now
owned or hereafter acquired by the county for the library. The counties may provide
on-line legal resources, including access and subscriptions to computer-assisted
legal research facilities and the related infrastructure required to access the
internet, and may acquire books, maps, computers and related equipment, or other
articles for the library by purchase, gift, or devise.
Section 2. KRS 172.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the adoption of this optional plan, in counties other than those containing a
city of the first class or consolidated local government, the Circuit Judge shall
appoint one (1) member of the county's bar, and the members of the county's bar
shall, by majority vote, elect another of their number, which two (2) attorneys shall,
with the county attorney of the county, constitute and be designated as "Trustees, ....
County Law Library." In counties containing a city of the first class or consolidated
local government, the Chief Circuit Judge shall appoint one (1) member of the
county's bar; the members of the county's bar shall, by majority vote, elect another
of their number; the fiscal court or consolidated local government pursuant to the
Page 1 of 3
BR135400.100 - 1354 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1354
provisions of KRS 67C.139 shall appoint one (1) member, and one (1) member
shall be appointed by the Commonwealth's attorney, which four (4) attorneys shall,
with the county attorney of the county, constitute and be designated as "Trustees,
........ County Law Library" or in a county containing a consolidated local
government, "Trustees, ......../..........County Law Library," which shall be a
combination of the names of the largest city in existence on the date of the approval
of the consolidated local government and the county.
(2) The trustees shall serve for a term of two (2) years or until their successors are
elected or qualified.
(3) The trustees shall be in charge of the county law library, and they shall make
purchases of the various state and federal case reports, textbooks, legal
encyclopedia, computers and related equipment, including access and
subscriptions to computer-assisted legal research facilities and the related
infrastructure required to access the internet, and all other books or equipment
usually incident to or customarily found in law libraries, or necessary to the
protection of the rights of litigants, and they shall cause same to be properly
arranged in the county law library or Court of Justice facilities, directing the ex
officio librarian in the exercise of his or her duties. The trustees may also provide
on-line legal resources for the use of library patrons.
(4) The trustees shall exercise their absolute discretion in the purchase of books,
pamphlets, periodicals, and other materials and equipment, and in the appointment
and compensation of personnel to assist the ex officio librarian in the handling of
materials and in the maintenance of the library, but the trustees shall not contract
for any such purchases and appointments so as to create an indebtedness greater
than the anticipated revenue for the following eighteen (18) months, the anticipated
revenue being based upon the preceding eighteen (18) months' revenue, and any
indebtedness of the county law library fund shall not be considered in any way an
Page 2 of 3
BR135400.100 - 1354 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1354
indebtedness of the county, but shall be an indebtedness of the county law library
fund only, and all creditors must look only to the county law library fund for
satisfaction of their indebtedness.
(5) The trustees shall designate one (1) of their number as treasurer and he or she shall:
(a) Be accountable for the receipt, deposit, and disbursement of all sums received
for the operation of the county law library;[. He shall]
(b) Be bonded by a corporate bond, the cost of which shall be paid out of the
receipts of the library fund;[. He shall]
(c) Deposit all sums received by him or her as treasurer in a regular banking
depository, and he or she shall pay for all purchases made by the trustees by
check or draft, keeping a true and accurate account of all sums received and
expended;[ by him. He shall]
(d) Annually file a written report with the Circuit Judge of the county showing all
sums received[ by him], together with the court from which they were
received, and an itemized statement of all expenditures made; and[ by him.
The treasurer shall]
(e) Turn all funds over to his or her successor, together with a full inventory of
the county law library, and together with a full and complete itemized
statement of all outstanding accounts.
Page 3 of 3
BR135400.100 - 1354 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:04 PM Jacketed